Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 2 Members and Employees of the General Assembly

47-2-160.
[Reserved] Inclusion of General Assembly members in retirement system; effect on rights under the Georgia Legislative Retirement System; rules and regulations; amount and financing of contributions.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 20, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1965, p. 106, § 3; Ga. L. 1965, p. 199, § 2; Ga. L. 1971, p. 109, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 95, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-161.
[Reserved] Membership service credit for service as a member of the General Assembly between January 1, 1954, and January 1, 1967.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 21, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1965, p. 106, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 199, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 199, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1856, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-162.
Eligibility of persons who are members of the General Assembly during or after January, 1962, for survivors benefits; contributions for such coverage; right to decline coverage.

Beginning in January, 1962, current and future members of the General Assembly shall make contributions to the retirement system for the limited purpose of providing survivors benefits under Code Sections 47-2-128 and 47-2-129, provided that any member of the General Assembly may reject such coverage, in which case no contributions shall be made by him or her; provided, further, that the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any person who becomes or again becomes a member of the General Assembly on or after July 1, 2009.

If a member accepts such coverage, the legislative fiscal officer is authorized and directed to pay to the board of trustees from funds appropriated for the operation of the General Assembly all accumulated contributions for survivors benefits that would have been paid had members of the General Assembly received survivors benefits coverage when it was originally extended to members of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 54, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 398, § 1/SB 177.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, near the end of subsection (a), inserted “or her” and substituted “the provisions of this Code section shall not apply to any person who becomes or again becomes a member of the General Assembly on or after July 1, 2009” for “in the event of the death of any member of the 1962 General Assembly prior to February 13, 1962, such member shall be deemed to have elected survivors benefits coverage, in which case any benefits payable shall be made to the deceased member’s surviving spouse and shall be paid from the sum of all contributions required under this Code section” at the end.

47-2-163.
Group term life insurance for members and former members of General Assembly; contributions.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees is authorized by rules or regulations to provide for group term life insurance protection for members and former members of the General Assembly; provided, however, that the provisions of this Code section shall not be applicable to persons who become or again become members of the General Assembly on or after July 1, 2009. The board of trustees may contract for such coverage with the State Employees’ Assurance Department pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 19 of this title. The board of trustees shall determine the amount of such coverage and the employee contribution that shall be made for such coverage by the members of the General Assembly. The board of trustees shall also determine the employer contribution necessary for such group term life insurance protection for members of the General Assembly. Such employer contribution shall be paid from funds appropriated or available to the legislative branch of the state government. The employee and employer contributions shall be paid into the survivors benefit fund provided for in subsection (c) of Code Section 47-2-128.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 54, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1263, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 398, § 2/SB 177.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the proviso at the end of the first sentence.

47-2-164.
Membership of employees of the General Assembly; contributions.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any employee of the General Assembly who is in a position which normally requires actual performance of duties during the full 12 months of the calendar year, as reflected by the state auditor’s report, shall, as a condition of his employment, become a member of the retirement system. Any contributing member who, without a break in service, becomes an employee of the General Assembly shall continue his membership during such employment.

Contributions from employees of the General Assembly shall be deducted by the legislative fiscal officer and remitted to the board of trustees, together with required employer contributions. The legislative fiscal officer is authorized and directed to pay the employer contribution from the funds appropriated for the operation of the General Assembly.

This Code section shall become effective on February 13, 1956, so as to apply to the 1956 regular term and all subsequent terms of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 54, § 3.

47-2-165.
Effect on retirement allowances of compensation, per diem, allowances, and expenses received as a member of the General Assembly.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the payment of a member’s retirement allowances shall not be suspended because of the compensation, per diem, allowances, and expenses received by him as an elected member of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 547, § 2.

47-2-166 through 47-2-168.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, §§ 22 through 24, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

These Code sections were based on Ga. L. 1964, p. 158, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 495, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 95, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”